Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1582.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 5 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS chapter
757.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in this section and sections 3 and 4 of this 2026 Act:
(1) “Aggregator” means an entity that is identified as having responsibility, in the pro-
vision of grid services, for coordinating the operations of enrolled devices of customers who,
through the entity, enroll and participate in an electric company’s distributed power plant
program.
(2) “Behind-the-meter” means the customer’s side of an electric meter.
(3) “Customer” means a person who has an active account for electricity services with
an electric company.
(4) “Distributed energy resource” means an energy system or device that is located
behind-the-meter and that generates or stores energy or provides energy management ca-
pabilities.
(5) “Distributed power plant” means an aggregation of distributed energy resources that
operate in coordination to provide one or more grid services.
(6) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(7) “Energy storage device” means a device that can store electrical energy at one point
or period of time for use at a later point or period of time.
(8) “Enrolled device” means a distributed energy resource that is enrolled in a distributed
power plant program.
(9) “Grid service” means an energy, capacity or ancillary service that supports electric
grid operations and is provided by one or more distributed energy resources.
(10) “Zero emission electricity” means electricity that is generated and may be stored in
a manner that does not emit greenhouse gas into the atmosphere.
[2]

SB 1582
SECTION 3. Distributed power plant program. (1)(a) Each electric company shall develop
and file with the Public Utility Commission a distributed power plant program, consistent
with the provisions of this section and section 4 of this 2026 Act, for the procurement of grid
services from customers of the electric company who enroll in the program.
(b) Within 120 days of an electric company filing a proposed distributed power plant
program or an amendment to a distributed power plant program, the commission shall deny,
approve or modify and approve the proposed program or amendment to the program.
(c) In its review of an electric company’s proposed distributed power plant program or
amendment to a distributed power plant program, the commission shall provide an opportu-
nity for, and take into consideration, input from the public and stakeholders.
(2) Under an electric company’s distributed power plant program, the electric company
shall:
(a) Offer customers of the electric company a standard offer, open access tariff for grid
services that are provided by distributed energy resources; and
(b) Develop and use a schedule of compensation and terms that is based on the grid
service provided and the class of distributed energy resource technology that is providing the
grid service.
(3) Grid services that are eligible for compensation under a standard offer, open access
tariff that is offered under an electric company’s distributed power plant program may in-
clude:
(a) System-wide peak load reduction;
(b) Local peak demand reduction;
(c) The provision of zero emission electricity to meet peak demand;
(d) Avoidance or deferral of transmission or distribution upgrades or capacity expansion
and other location-specific grid services;
(e) Voltage support for maintaining stable voltage levels in the electric grid;
(f) Emergency services; and
(g) Any other grid services determined by the commission to support efficient planning
or operation of the electric grid.
(4) The classes of distributed energy resources technologies that may provide grid ser-
vices under an electric company’s distributed power plant program must include, but are not
limited to, the following:
(a) Energy storage devices that are a battery;
(b) Load control devices, including but not limited to, smart thermostats, water heaters
and other load control devices approved by the commission; and
(c) Electric vehicles.
(5) A distributed power plant program must specify the operational parameters for each
grid service based on the class of distributed energy resource technology that provides the
grid service. At a minimum, operational parameters must include:
(a) The minimum and maximum number of times an enrolled device may be dispatched
in a 12-month period;
(b) The months of the year, days of the week and times of the day that an enrolled device
may be dispatched;
(c) The maximum duration for which an enrolled device may be dispatched; and
(d) The notification requirements for when an enrolled device will be dispatched, except
[3]

SB 1582
in response to an emergency event.
(6) A customer of an electric company may enroll:
(a) Directly or through an aggregator in the electric company’s distributed power plant
program.
(b) For as many grid services and as many distributed energy resource devices that are
provided for under an electric company’s distributed power plant program. A customer may
only enroll a distributed energy resource device that the customer uses for the customer’s
personal benefit, but the device may be owned or maintained by the customer or a third
party.
(7)(a) If a customer enrolls directly in an electric company’s distributed power plant
program, the electric company shall provide the customer an upfront payment and per-
formance compensation for each distributed energy resource device the customer enrolls in
the program.
(b) The electric company may not require, as a condition to participating in the program,
a customer to install an additional meter or provide a security deposit or collateral.
(c) An electric company is allowed to communicate with, send a dispatch signal to or
verify the performance of any enrolled device consistent with the terms of the electric
company’s distributed power plant program and any standards or requirements adopted by
the commission.
(d) An electric company may disenroll a customer or an enrolled device after one year
of participation for repeated nonperformance of the enrolled device. Prior to disenrolling a
customer or a device, during the course of the year, the electric company shall provide suf-
ficient notice and opportunity to cure the nonperformance. An electric company may not
assess a penalty for the nonperformance of an enrolled device.
(e) An electric company may adopt reasonable requirements as approved by the com-
mission for participating in the electric company’s distributed power plant program.
(8)(a) If a customer enrolls through an aggregator in an electric company’s distributed
power plant program, the electric company shall follow the provisions of subsection (7) of
this section except the electric company shall work with, communicate through and provide
all payments and compensation to the aggregator.
(b) An aggregator shall be responsible for:
(A) Managing the participation of the customers whom the aggregator enrolls;
(B) Maintaining good communication with the electric company;
(C) Receiving dispatch signals from the electric company;
(D) Communicating directly with and managing the performance of the devices enrolled
through the aggregator in the distributed power plant program;
(E) Providing the electric company with data needed to verify the performance of the
devices enrolled through the aggregator in the distributed power plant program; and
(F) Receiving payments and compensation from the electric company.
(c) An aggregator shall be considered a participant of the program.
(d) An electric company or an affiliate of an electric company may not be an aggregator.
(9) An electric company’s distributed power plant program may provide for a higher up-
front payment for a class of customers that is based on the differential energy burdens on
low- and moderate-income customers and other economic, social equity or environmental
justice factors that affect affordability for certain classes of utility customers.
[4]

SB 1582
(10) Under an electric company’s distributed power plant program, a customer or
aggregator shall be given the option to enter into an agreement that sets the performance
compensation rate for a period of five years or longer. The option must be exercised by the
customer or aggregator at the time the customer, whether directly or through an
aggregator, enrolls or renews enrollment in the program.
(11) A customer may participate in an electric company’s distributed power plant pro-
gram in addition to participating in any other program offered by the electric company. Any
payment or compensation that a customer receives under an electric company’s distributed
power plant program shall be in addition to any incentive, payment or credit that a customer
is entitled to receive under any other program in which the customer is participating, in-
cluding any net metering program established pursuant to ORS 757.300.
(12) A distributed energy resource that is owned by an electric company or an affiliate
of an electric company may not be enrolled in an electric company’s distributed power plant
program.
(13) An electric company may contract with a third party to provide a distributed energy
resource management system to assist the electric company in implementing the electric
company’s distributed power plant program.
(14) All prudently incurred costs associated with an electric company’s distributed power
plant program, including upfront payments and performance payments, are recoverable in
the rates of an electric company. The commission may allow a reasonable rate of return on
the performance payments made by an electric company for grid services provided under the
electric company’s distributed power plant program.
SECTION 4. Procurement targets; performance incentives; annual report. (1)(a) The
Public Utility Commission shall develop and adopt:
(A) Annual procurement targets, for a five-year period, for the procurement of grid ser-
vices under a distributed power plant program approved under section 3 of this 2026 Act; and
(B) Annual performance incentives for achieving those procurement targets.
(b) The procurement targets must require a meaningful annual increase in the amount
of grid services that an electric company procures under the electric company’s distributed
power plant program.
(c) The performance incentives:
(A) Must include financial incentives for achieving procurement targets; and
(B) May include financial penalties for failing to achieve procurement targets.
(2) Prior to the expiration of a five-year period, the commission shall develop and adopt
annual procurement targets and performance incentives for the subsequent five-year period.
(3) If an electric company adds a grid service to the electric company’s distributed power
plant program tariff, the commission shall develop and adopt, within 270 days of the electric
company adding the grid service, annual procurement targets and performance incentives for
the grid service.
(4) Annual procurement targets and performance incentives that are adopted by the
commission for the procurement of a grid service must take effect no later than January 1
of the year following the year in which the commission approves the procurement of the grid
service under a distributed power plant program.
(5)(a) No later than January 31 of each year, each electric company shall file a report
with the commission on the status of the electric company’s distributed power plant pro-
[5]

SB 1582
gram. The report must include a description of:
(A) The total capacity enrolled in the electric company’s distributed power plant pro-
gram;
(B) The capacity enrolled based on:
(i) Each grid service offered;
(ii) Each class of distributed energy resource technology;
(iii) Each customer class; and
(iv) Customers enrolled directly and customers enrolled through an aggregator;
(C) The number of events called during the calendar year for each grid service;
(D) The aggregate performance of each class of distributed energy resource technology
for each grid service that a class provided; and
(E) By separate accounting, the total amount of upfront payments and performance
payments issued for each grid service and each class of distributed energy resource tech-
nology providing the grid service.
(b) The report shall include recommendations for increasing participation in the electric
company’s distributed power plant program.
(c) The commission may require a report to include additional information as the com-
mission finds necessary for evaluating the status of an electric company’s distributed power
plant program.
SECTION 5. Initial requirements; timeline. (1)(a) An electric company shall first file with
the Public Utility Commission the electric company’s proposed distributed energy resources
program under section 3 of this 2026 Act within 120 days of the effective date of this 2026
Act.
(b) At a minimum, the electric company’s initial distributed power plant program must
provide for compensation for system-wide peak load reduction that is provided by an energy
storage device that is a battery. For system-wide peak load reduction that is provided by an
energy storage device that is a battery, the performance compensation shall be based on the
average capacity discharged from the device over the course of each event during the appli-
cable capability period, measured directly at the device.
(c) Notwithstanding section 3 (4) of this 2026 Act and except as provided in paragraph (d)
of this subsection, an electric company’s initial distributed power plant program does not
need to provide for the following classes of distributed energy resources technologies:
(A) Load control devices; or
(B) Electric vehicles.
(d) Where feasible, an electric company shall incorporate any existing programs offered
by the electric company into the electric company’s distributed energy resources program,
such as smart thermostat demand response and electric vehicle charging programs.
(2) Notwithstanding section 3 (1)(b) of this 2026 Act, within 120 days of an electric com-
pany first filing with the commission a proposed distributed energy resources program, the
commission may not deny a proposed distributed energy resources program and shall either
approve or modify and approve the electric company’s proposed distributed energy resources
program.
(3) Notwithstanding section 4 (3) of this 2026 Act, within 270 days of the effective date
of this 2026 Act, the commission shall develop and adopt annual procurement targets and
performance incentives for system-wide peak load reduction that is provided by an energy
[6]

SB 1582
storage device that is a battery.
(4) Within 12 months from the date that the commission approves an electric company’s
initial distributed power plant program under subsection (2) of this section, the electric
company shall file an amendment under section 3 of this 2026 Act to the electric company’s
distributed power plant program. The amendment must incorporate and provide for the fol-
lowing classes of distributed energy resources technologies, to the extent the classes were
not included in the electric company’s initial distributed power plant program:
(a) Load control devices; and
(b) Electric vehicles.
(5) The provisions of this section apply to an electric company that exists on the effective
date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 6. Captions. The section captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 7. Effective date. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on
which the 2026 regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[7]